New Mexico, session 2026, SB43.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF NEW MEXICO:
SECTION 1. Section 31-21-10 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 1980,
Chapter 28, Section 1, as amended) is amended to read:
"31-21-10. PAROLE AUTHORITY AND PROCEDURE.--
A. Except as provided in Section 31-21-10.2
NMSA 1978, an inmate of an institution who was sentenced to
life imprisonment becomes eligible for a parole hearing after
the inmate has served thirty years of the sentence, which
shall be construed as the retributive portion of the life
sentence. Upon reaching eligibility, parole consideration
for release shall focus on:
(1) risk and readiness for release, as
demonstrated by the inmate substantially complying with the
rules of the institution to which the inmate has been
confined;
(2) whether the inmate has participated in
or completed an educational, a vocational or another program,
where available, while confined; and SB 43
Page 1

(3) whether the inmate has demonstrated
maturity, rehabilitation and a fitness to reenter society.
B. Before ordering the parole of an inmate
sentenced to life imprisonment, the board shall:
(1) interview the inmate at the institution
where the inmate is committed;
(2) hear from the family or representative
of the victim, if the family or representative chooses to
participate;
(3) consider all pertinent information
concerning the inmate, including:
(a) the circumstances of the offense,
including mitigating and aggravating circumstances;
(b) whether a deadly weapon was used in
the commission of the offense;
(c) the inmate's relevant criminal
history;
(d) the reports filed pursuant to

Section 31-21-9 NMSA 1978; and

(e) the reports of such physical and

mental examinations as have been made while the inmate was in

an institution;

(4) make a finding that a parole is in the

best interest of society and the inmate; and

(5) make a finding that the inmate is able
SB 43
Page 2

and willing to fulfill the obligations of a law-abiding
citizen.
C. If parole is denied, the inmate sentenced to
life imprisonment shall again become entitled to a parole
hearing at two-year intervals. The board may, on its own
motion, reopen any case in which a hearing has already been
granted and parole denied.
D. Unless the board finds that it is in the best
interest of society and the parolee to reduce the period of
parole, a person who was sentenced to life imprisonment shall
be required to undergo a minimum period of parole of five
years. During the period of parole, the person shall be
under the guidance and supervision of the board.
E. An inmate of an institution who was sentenced
to life imprisonment without possibility of release or parole
is not eligible for parole and shall remain incarcerated for
the entirety of the inmate's natural life.
F. Except for certain sex offenders as provided in

Section 31-21-10.1 NMSA 1978, an inmate who was convicted of

a first, second or third degree felony and who has served the

sentence of imprisonment imposed by the court in an

institution designated by the corrections department shall be

required to undergo a two-year period of parole. An inmate

who was convicted of a fourth degree felony and who has

served the sentence of imprisonment imposed by the court in
SB 43
Page 3

an institution designated by the corrections department shall
be required to undergo a one-year period of parole. During
the period of parole, the person shall be under the guidance
and supervision of the board.
G. Every person while on parole shall remain in
the legal custody of the institution from which the person
was released, but shall be subject to the orders of the
board. The board shall furnish to each inmate as a
prerequisite to release under its supervision a written
statement of the conditions of parole that shall be accepted
and agreed to by the inmate as evidenced by the inmate's
signature affixed to a duplicate copy to be retained in the
files of the board. The board shall also require as a
prerequisite to release the submission and approval of a
parole plan. If an inmate refuses to affix the inmate's
signature to the written statement of the conditions of
parole or does not have an approved parole plan, the inmate
shall not be released and shall remain in the custody of the

institution in which the inmate has served the inmate's

sentence, excepting parole, until such time as the period of

parole the inmate was required to serve, less meritorious

deductions, if any, expires, at which time the inmate shall

be released from that institution without parole, or until

such time that the inmate evidences acceptance and agreement

to the conditions of parole as required or receives approval
SB 43
Page 4

for the inmate's parole plan or both. Time served from the
date that an inmate refuses to accept and agree to the
conditions of parole or fails to receive approval for the
inmate's parole plan shall reduce the period, if any, to be
served under parole at a later date. If the district court
has ordered that the inmate make restitution to a victim as
provided in Section 31-17-1 NMSA 1978, the board shall
include restitution as a condition of parole. The board
shall also personally apprise the inmate of the conditions of
parole and the inmate's duties relating to those conditions
of parole.
H. When a person on parole has performed the
obligations of the person's release for the period of parole
provided in this section, the board shall make a final order
of discharge and issue the person a certificate of discharge.
I. The provisions of this section shall apply to
all inmates except geriatric, permanently incapacitated and
terminally ill inmates eligible for the medical and geriatric

parole program as provided by the Parole Board Act."

SECTION 2. Section 31-21-22 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 1975,

Chapter 194, Section 1) is amended to read:

"31-21-22. SHORT TITLE.--Sections 31-21-22 through

31-21-26 NMSA 1978 may be cited as the "Parole Board Act"."

SECTION 3. Section 31-21-24 NMSA 1978 (being Laws 1975,

Chapter 194, Section 3, as amended) is amended to read:
SB 43
Page 5

"31-21-24. PAROLE BOARD--MEMBERS--APPOINTMENT--TERMS--
QUALIFICATIONS--COMPENSATION--ORGANIZATION.--
A. The "parole board" is created, consisting of
fifteen members appointed by the governor with the consent of
the senate.
B. The terms of the members of the parole board
shall be six years. To provide for staggered terms, five
members shall be appointed every two years. Members serve
until their successors have been appointed and qualified.
C. Members of the parole board may be removed by
the governor as provided in Article 5, Section 5 of the
constitution of New Mexico. Vacancies shall be filled by
appointment by the governor for the remainder of the
unexpired term.
D. Members of the parole board shall be persons
qualified by such academic training or professional
experience as is deemed necessary to render them fit to serve
as members of the board. No member of the board shall be an

official or employee of any other federal, state or local

government entity.

E. Members of the parole board shall receive per

diem and mileage as provided for nonsalaried public officers

in the Per Diem and Mileage Act for a scheduled board meeting

or hearing or any other reimbursable activity under that act

and shall receive no other compensation, perquisite or
SB 43
Page 6

allowance.
F. The governor shall designate one member of the
parole board to serve as chair, who in addition to other
duties shall coordinate with the corrections department
in the furnishing of services pursuant to Section 9-3-11
NMSA 1978.
G. A parole may be granted, denied or revoked by a
quorum of two on a panel consisting of three parole board
members appointed on a rotating basis by the chair of the
board."
SECTION 4. A new section of the Parole Board Act,
Section 31-21-25.2 NMSA 1978, is enacted to read:
"31-21-25.2. SCHEDULING OF HEARINGS IN CASES OF
HOMICIDE.--In cases of homicide, the parole board shall not
schedule a hearing on the anniversary of the birth or death of
the person or persons whose death is the basis for the
homicide conviction, when practicable." SB 43
Page 7